Idaho statutes. Title 23 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
Chapter 9
RETAIL SALE OF LIQUOR BY THE DRINK

Sec.

§ 23-901. Declaration of policy — Retail sale of liquor.

It is hereby declared as the policy of the state of Idaho that it is necessary to further regulate and control the sale and distribution within the state of alcoholic beverages and to eliminate certain illegal traffic in liquor now existing and to insure the entire control of the sale of liquor it is advisable and necessary, in addition to the operation of the state liquor stores now provided by law, that the director of the Idaho state police and the county commissioners and the councils of cities in the state of Idaho be empowered and authorized to grant licenses to persons qualified under this act to sell liquor purchased by them at state liquor stores at retail posted prices in accordance with this act and under the rules promulgated by said director and under his strict supervision and control and to provide severe penalty for the sale of liquor except by and in state liquor stores and by persons licensed under this act. The restrictions, rules, and provisions contained in this act are enacted by the legislature for the protection, health, welfare and safety of the people of the state of Idaho and for the purpose of promoting and encouraging temperance in the use of alcoholic beverages within the state of Idaho.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 1, p. 870; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 16, p. 811; am. 2000, ch. 469, § 61, p. 1450.

§ 23-902. Definitions.

The following words and phrases used in this chapter shall be given the following interpretation:

“Club” includes any of the following organizations where the sale of spirituous liquor for consumption on the premises is made to members and to bona fide guests of members only:

A post, chapter, camp or other local unit composed solely of veterans and their duly recognized auxiliary, and which is a post, chapter, camp or other local unit composed solely of veterans which has been chartered by the congress of the United States for patriotic, fraternal or benevolent purposes, and which has, as the owner, lessee or occupant, operated an establishment for that purpose in this state; or

A chapter, aerie, parlor, lodge or other local unit of an American national fraternal organization, which has, as the owner, lessee or occupant, operated an establishment for fraternal purposes in this state and actively operates in not less than thirty-six (36) states or has been in continuous existence for not less than twenty (20) years; and which has no fewer than fifty (50) bona fide members in each unit, and which owns, maintains or operates club quarters, and is authorized and incorporated to operate as a nonprofit club under the laws of this state, and which has recognized tax exempt status under section 501(c)(8) or 501(c)(10) of the Internal Revenue Code, and has been continuously incorporated and operating for a period of not less than one (1) year. The club shall have had, during that period of one (1) year, a bona fide membership with regular meetings conducted at least once each month, and the membership shall be and shall have been actively engaged in carrying out the objects of the club. The club membership shall consist of bona fide dues-paying members, recorded by the secretary of the club, paying at least six dollars ($6.00) per year in dues, payable monthly, quarterly or annually; and the members at the time of application for a club license shall be in good standing, having paid dues for at least one (1) full year.

“Convention” means a formal meeting of members, representatives, or delegates, as of a political party, fraternal society, profession or industry.

“Director” means the director of the Idaho state police.

“Festival” means a period or program of festive activities, cultural events or entertainment lasting three (3) or more consecutive days.

“Gaming” means any and all gambling or games of chance defined in chapters 38 and 49, title 18, Idaho Code, or any section or sections thereof, whether those games are licensed or unlicensed.

“Interdicted person” means a person to whom the sale of liquor is prohibited under law.

“License” means a license issued by the director to a qualified person, under which it shall be lawful for the licensee to sell and dispense liquor by the drink at retail, as provided by law.

“Licensee” means the person to whom a license is issued under the provisions of law.

“Liquor” means all kinds of liquor sold by and in a state liquor store of the state of Idaho.

“Live performance” means a performance occurring in a theater and not otherwise in violation of any provision of Idaho law.

“Municipal license” means a license issued by a municipality of the state of Idaho under the provisions of law.
(12) “Party” means a social gathering especially for pleasure or amusement and includes, but is not limited to, such social events as weddings, birthdays, and special holiday celebrations to include, but not be limited to, New Year’s celebrations, Super Bowl Sunday, St. Patrick’s Day, the Fourth of July and Labor Day.

(13) “Person” means any individual, corporation, business corporation, nonprofit corporation, benefit corporation as defined in section 30-2002(1), Idaho Code, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, general cooperative association, limited cooperative association, estate, unincorporated nonprofit association, statutory trust, business trust, common-law business trust, estate trust, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality, any entity defined in section 30-21-102, Idaho Code, or any other commercial entity, whether conducting the business singularly or collectively.

(14) “Plaza” means a public square, marketplace, or similar open space in a city or town.

(15) “Premises” means the building and contiguous property owned or leased or used under a government permit by a licensee, as part of the business establishment in the business of sale of liquor by the drink at retail, which property is improved to include decks, docks, boardwalks, lawns, gardens, golf courses, ski resorts, courtyards, patios, poolside areas or similar improved appurtenances in which the sale of liquor by the drink at retail is authorized under the provisions of law.

(16) “Rules” means rules promulgated by the director in accordance with the provisions of law.

(17) “State liquor store” means a liquor store or distributor established under and pursuant to the laws of the state of Idaho for the package sale of liquor at retail.

(18) “Theater” means a room, place or outside structure for performances or readings of dramatic literature, plays or dramatic representations of an art form not in violation of any provision of Idaho law.

(19) “Brewery” means a place, premises or establishment for the manufacture, bottling or canning of beer.

(20) “Winery” means a place, premises or establishment within the state of Idaho for the manufacture or bottling of table wine or dessert wine for sale. Two (2) or more wineries may use the same premises and the same equipment to manufacture their respective wines, to the extent permitted by federal law.

(21) All other words and phrases used in this chapter, the definitions of which are not herein given, shall be given their ordinary and commonly understood and acceptable meanings.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 2, p. 870; am. 1949, ch. 276, § 1, p. 565; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 17, p. 811; am. 1978, ch. 44, § 1, p. 78; am. 1983, ch. 203, § 1, p. 551; am. 1986, ch. 36, § 1, p. 118; am. 1999, ch. 58, § 1, p. 146; am. 2000, ch. 469, § 62, p. 1450; am. 2003, ch. 111, § 1, p. 348; am. 2016, ch. 153, § 1, p. 422; am. 2016, ch. 268, § 1, p. 721; am. 2016, ch. 357, § 1, p. 1048; am. 2017, ch. 58, § 11, p. 91; am. 2019, ch. 83, § 1, p. 198.

§ 23-903. License to retail liquor.

The director of the Idaho state police is hereby empowered, authorized, and directed to issue licenses to qualified applicants, as herein provided, whereby the licensee shall be authorized and permitted to sell liquor by the drink at retail and, upon the issuance of such license, the licensee therein named shall be authorized to sell liquor at retail by the drink, but only in accordance with the rules promulgated by the director and the provisions of this chapter. No license shall be issued for the sale of liquor on any premises outside the incorporated limits of any city except as provided in this chapter and the number of licenses so issued for any city shall not exceed one (1) license for each one thousand five hundred (1,500) of population of said city or fraction thereof, as established in the last preceding census, or any subsequent special census conducted by the United States bureau of the census or by an estimate that is statistically valid including adding the number of new residential utility connections or including adding the population of areas annexed into the city after the last census or special census was conducted, except that upon proper application thereof not more than two (2) licenses may be issued for each incorporated city with a population of one thousand five hundred (1,500) or less, unless the retail licensing of liquor by the drink has been previously disapproved under the provisions of sections 23-917, 23-918, 23-919, 23-920 and 23-921, Idaho Code; provided however, that any license heretofore issued may be renewed from year to year without regard to the population or status of the city for which such license is issued. Any license issued and which has remained in effect at its location for a consecutive period of ten (10) years or more shall be deemed to have been validly issued and may be renewed from year to year provided however, that the applicant for the renewal of such license is not otherwise disqualified for licensure pursuant to section 23-910, Idaho Code, and, if the premises required special characteristics for original licensure, other than being either within or without the incorporated limits of a city, that said premises continue to have such special characteristics at the time of the application for renewal.

Nothing herein contained shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of an actual bona fide golf course whether located within or without the limits of any city, or located on premises also operated as a winery or ski resort, or to the lessee of any premises situate thereon, whether located within or without the limits of any city. For the purpose of this section, a golf course shall comprise an actual bona fide golf course, which is regularly used for the playing of the game of golf, and having not less than nine (9) tees, fairways and greens laid out and used in the usual and regular manner of a golf course. Nine (9) hole courses must have a total yardage of at least one thousand (1,000) yards, and eighteen (18) hole courses must have a total yardage of at least two thousand (2,000) yards as measured by totaling the tee-to-green distance of all holes. The course must be planted in grass except that it may provide artificial tee mats. Where any such golf course is owned or leased by an association of members and is used or enjoyed by such members or their guests, none of the disqualifications contained in section 23-910, Idaho Code, shall apply to such association as a licensee where such disqualifications, or any of them, would apply only to a member of such association where such member has no interest therein except as a member thereof.
(3) Also for the purpose of this section, a ski resort shall comprise real property of not less than ten (10) acres in size, exclusive of the terrain used for skiing and upon which the owner, operator or lessee of the ski resort has made available himself or through others, including, but not limited to, the owners of condominiums, permanent bona fide overnight accommodations available to the general public for one hundred (100) persons or more, and which real property is contiguous to or located within the area in which skiing occurs, and which real property is regularly operated as a ski resort in the wintertime, and where the owner, operator or lessee of the ski resort is also the owner, operator or lessee of the area served by a bona fide chair ski lift facility or facilities. Alternatively, for the purpose of this section, a ski resort may also be defined as a downhill ski area, open to the public, comprising real property of not less than two hundred fifty (250) skiable acres, operating two (2) or more chairlifts with a vertical lift of one thousand (1,000) feet or more, and capable of transporting a minimum of one thousand eight hundred (1,800) skiers per hour. A ski resort qualifying under this definition shall also have on the premises a lodge facility providing shelter and food service to the public, the operator of which shall also be the valid owner or lessee of the grounds and facilities upon which the ski resort offers downhill skiing services to the public. The fees for licenses granted to ski resorts shall be the same as those prescribed for golf courses as set forth in section 23-904, Idaho Code. Not more than one (1) licensed premises shall be permitted on any golf course or any ski resort or within the area comprising the same.

(4) Nothing herein contained shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of an actual bona fide equestrian facility located on not less than forty (40) contiguous acres, with permanently erected seating of not less than six thousand (6,000) seats, no part of which equestrian facility or the premises thereon is situate within the incorporated limits of any city, and which facility shall have at least three (3) days per year of a professionally sanctioned rodeo. Not more than one (1) licensed premises shall be permitted at any equestrian facility or within an area comprising such a facility. The fees for licenses granted to equestrian facilities shall be the same as those prescribed for golf courses as set forth in section 23-904, Idaho Code.

(5) Nothing herein contained shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of a restaurant operated on an airport owned or operated by a county or municipal corporation or on an airport owned or operated jointly by a county and municipal corporation, and which said airport is served by a trunk or local service air carrier holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the civil aeronautics board of the United States of America. Not more than one (1) license shall be issued on any airport.

(6) Nothing herein contained shall prohibit the issuance of one (1) club license to a club as defined in section 23-902, Idaho Code. The holder of a club license is authorized to sell and serve alcoholic beverages for consumption only within the licensed establishment owned, leased or occupied by the club, and only to bona fide members of the club, and to serve and to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption to bona fide members’ guests. A club license issued pursuant to the provisions of this section is not transferable and may not be sold. Any club license issued pursuant to the provisions of this section will revert to the director when, in his judgment, the licensee ceases to operate as a bona fide club as defined in section 23-902, Idaho Code. No club may hold a liquor license and a club license simultaneously. A club which on July 1, 1983, holds a liquor license, may continue to possess that license. Any club that possesses a liquor license on January 1, 1983, or thereafter, and then sells that liquor license, may not obtain a club license, and the director shall not issue a club license to that club for a period of five (5) years following such sale. The fee for any license issued to a qualifying club within an incorporated municipality shall be as prescribed in subsections (1), (2) and (3) of section 23-904, Idaho Code. The fee for any license issued to a qualifying club not situate within an incorporated municipality shall be as specified for golf courses under section 23-904(6), Idaho Code. The provisions of section 23-916, Idaho Code, regarding county and city licenses, shall pertain to club licenses. The burden of producing sufficient documentation of qualifications for club licensure shall be with the club applicant.
(7) Nothing in this chapter to the contrary shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of an actual bona fide convention center that is within the incorporated limits of a city having a population of three thousand (3,000) or greater, and which city does not have located therein a convention center with a valid convention center license to sell liquor by the drink. For the purpose of this section, a convention center means a facility having at least thirty-five thousand (35,000) square feet of floor space or a facility having at least one hundred twenty (120) sleeping rooms and an adjoining meeting room that will accommodate not less than three hundred fifty (350) persons, whether or not such room may be partitioned into smaller rooms, and provided that such meeting room shall contain at least three thousand (3,000) square feet of floor space. Such license must be placed in actual use in said convention center within one (1) year from the date of its issuance. The fee for any license issued to a qualifying convention center shall be as prescribed in subsection (3) of section 23-904, Idaho Code. The holder of a convention center license shall not be eligible for the issuance of a license in the same city pursuant to any other provision of this chapter. For purposes of this section, the term “holder” shall include an owner, operator or lessee and shall include a stockholder, director or officer of a corporation or a partner in a partnership, which corporation or partnership has been issued a convention center license pursuant to this chapter. Not more than one (1) licensed premises shall be permitted on any convention center or within the area comprising the same, including convention centers that also comprise golf courses or ski resorts as herein defined.

(8) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of a food, beverage and/or lodging facility that has been in continuous operation in the same location for at least seventy-five (75) years, except for temporary closings for refurbishing or reconstruction, or a food, beverage and lodging facility serving the public by reservation only, having a minimum of five (5) rooms operating in a structure that has been in existence for at least seventy-five (75) years and has been on the historic register for a minimum of ten (10) years, is situated within five hundred (500) yards of a natural lake containing a minimum of thirty-six thousand (36,000) acre feet of water when full with a minimum of thirty-two (32) miles of shoreline, and is located in a county with a minimum population of sixty-five thousand (65,000). The provisions of section 23-910, Idaho Code, shall apply to licenses issued to continuous operation facilities. The fees shall be the same as those prescribed for golf courses as set forth in section 23-904, Idaho Code.
(9) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the issuance of a license to a federally recognized Indian tribe as defined in section 67-4001, Idaho Code, which is an owner, operator or lessee of a food, conference and lodging facility located within the boundaries of the Indian tribe’s reservation and containing a minimum of thirty-five thousand (35,000) square feet and fifty (50) guest rooms. Licenses issued to Indian tribes are not transferable.

(10) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of the lodging, dining and entertainment facilities owned by a gondola resort complex and operated in conjunction with the other public services provided by a gondola resort complex located within the ownership/leasehold boundaries of a gondola resort complex.

A gondola resort complex means an actual bona fide gondola capable of transporting people for recreational and/or entertainment purposes at least three (3) miles in length with a vertical rise of three thousand (3,000) feet, portions of which may be located within or over the limits of one (1) or more cities.

(11) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of a winery also operating a golf course on the premises.

(12) Subject to approval of the mayor and city council, nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of a food, conference and lodging facility constructed after May 1, 2000, containing a minimum of thirty-five thousand (35,000) square feet and fifty-five (55) guest rooms with a minimum taxable value of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in a city with a population of less than five thousand (5,000) according to the most recent census.

(13) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the issuance of a license to the owner, operator or lessee of a conference and event center that is within the city limits of a resort city as defined in section 50-1044, Idaho Code, that has enacted local option nonproperty taxes in accordance with section 50-1046, Idaho Code, including, at the time of issuance, a resort city tax on sales of liquor by the drink, wine and beer sold at retail for consumption on the licensed premises. There shall be only one (1) conference and event center license to sell liquor by the drink issued per resort city pursuant to this subsection. For the purposes of this section, a conference and event center means facilities situated on premises consisting of a building or buildings and the contiguous property owned or leased and under common ownership or control by the licensee. Such facilities must provide not less than four thousand (4,000) square feet of enclosed space for conference and event purposes, exclusive of space dedicated by the licensee to the commercial kitchen. The commercial kitchen must include a type 1 commercial hood and cooking equipment, exclusive of microwave ovens and grills. The fee for any license issued to a qualifying licensee shall be as prescribed in section 23-904(1), (2) or (3), Idaho Code, depending on the population of the resort city in which the conference and event center is located and as prescribed in section 23-916, Idaho Code. A license issued pursuant to this section [subsection] may be renewed without regard to the population or status of the city for which the license was issued and without regard for the continuation of local option nonproperty taxes by the city, provided the applicant for renewal is not otherwise disqualified from licensure pursuant to section 23-910, Idaho Code. Not more than one (1) license shall be issued to a conference and event center. A conference and event center license shall not be transferable and may not be sold. For the purpose of issuance and maintenance of a license under this subsection, such facilities may serve liquor only while such facilities are hosting a conference or event. Nothing in this subsection shall excuse a conference and event center from complying with actual use standards in title 23, Idaho Code, or administrative rules promulgated pursuant to statutory authority granted under this title.
(14) The provisions of section 23-910, Idaho Code, shall apply to licenses issued under the provisions of this section. The fees shall be the same as those prescribed for golf courses as set forth in section 23-904, Idaho Code. Except for licenses issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, licenses issued under the provisions of this section are not transferable to any other location, facility or premises.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 3, p. 870; am. 1957, ch. 151, § 1, p. 250; am. 1959, ch. 118, § 1, p. 254; am. 1963, ch. 215, § 1, p. 622; am. 1965, ch. 35, § 1, p. 52; am. 1972, ch. 34, § 1, p. 53; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 18, p. 811; am. 1978, ch. 126, § 2, p. 285; am. 1983, ch. 167, § 1, p. 473; am. 1983, ch. 203, § 2, p. 551; am. 1984, ch. 244, § 1, p. 590; am. 1989, ch. 164, § 1, p. 411; am. 1989, ch. 207, § 1, p. 507; am. 1989, ch. 301, § 1, p. 749; am. 1990, ch. 252, § 1, p. 722; am. 1990, ch. 255, § 1, p. 729; am. 1990, ch. 392, § 1, p. 1098; am. 1992, ch. 233, § 1, p. 697; am. 1993, ch. 240, § 1, p. 845; am. 1995, ch. 358, § 1, p. 1214; am. 1996, ch. 349, § 1, p. 1167; am. 1997, ch. 263, § 1, p. 749; am. 2000, ch. 469, § 63, p. 1450; am. 2004, ch. 44, § 1, p. 165; am. 2006, ch. 449, § 3, p. 1333; am. 2008, ch. 335, § 1, p. 920; am. 2008, ch. 405, § 1, p. 1110; am. 2013, ch. 167, § 1, p. 382; am. 2013, ch. 278, § 1, p. 718; am. 2015, ch. 333, § 1, p. 1260.

§ 23-903a. License to retail liquor — Ski resorts — Cross-country skiing facilities.

If the director determines that an applicant or applicants are qualified to receive a ski resort or cross-country skiing facility license, he shall notify the chairman of the board of county commissioners in the county in which the ski resort or cross-country skiing facility license is to be issued. The county commissioners shall, within fifteen (15) days after receipt of notification from the director, approve or disapprove the issuance of the license. In the event the county commissioners do not approve the proposed license, a license shall not be issued.

History.

1972, ch. 34, § 2, p. 52; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 19, p. 811; am. 1987, ch. 32, § 1, p. 53.

§ 23-903b. Licenses issued to owners, operators or lessees of golf courses, ski resorts, cross-country skiing facilities and waterfront resorts — Limitations on sales or transfers.

No license issued to an owner, operator, or lessee of a golf course, ski resort, cross-country skiing facility or waterfront resort, as defined in sections 23-903, 23-948 and 23-952, Idaho Code, shall be transferable to another location or facility, except as otherwise provided in section 23-956, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-903b, as added by 1979, ch. 256, § 1, p. 679; am. 1987, ch. 32, § 2, p. 53; am. 1991, ch. 137, § 1, p. 320; am. 2005, ch. 357, § 1, p. 1128.

§ 23-904. License fees.

Each licensee licensed under the provisions of this act shall pay an annual license fee to the director as follows:

For each license in a city of one thousand (1,000) population or less, three hundred dollars ($300) per annum.

For each license in a city of from one thousand (1,000) to three thousand (3,000) population, five hundred dollars ($500) per annum.

For each license in a city having a population of more than three thousand (3,000), seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) per annum.

For each railroad train for sale only in buffet, club or dining cars, fifty dollars ($50.00) per annum of the scheduled run of such train within the state of Idaho; provided, that such license shall be in full, and in lieu of all other licenses herein provided for.

For each common carrier boat line for sale only in buffet, club dining rooms, two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per annum. Such license shall be in full, and in lieu of all other licenses herein provided for.

For each license issued to the owner, operator, or lessee of a golf course as described in section 23-903, Idaho Code, or to the lessee of any premises situate on such golf course, situate in any county having a population of:

Less than twenty thousand (20,000), two hundred dollars ($200) per annum;

Twenty thousand (20,000) but less than forty thousand (40,000), three hundred dollars ($300) per annum; and

Forty thousand (40,000) or more, four hundred dollars ($400) per annum.

For each common carrier airline for sale only in common carrier aircraft, two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per annum. Such license shall be in full, and in lieu of all other licenses herein provided for.

For each license issued to the owner, operator, or lessee of a restaurant operated on an airport, as described in section 23-903, Idaho Code, situate within the corporate limits of a city, the fee shall be the same as provided in paragraphs (1) through (3), inclusive, of this section.

For each license issued to the owner, operator, or lessee of a restaurant operated on an airport, as described in section 23-903, Idaho Code, situate without the corporate limits of a city, the fee shall be the same as provided in paragraph (6) of this section. Licenses issued under and pursuant to the provisions of this act shall expire at 1:00 o’clock a.m. on the first day of January of the following year.

For each license issued to an owner or operator of a year-round resort as described in section 23-957, Idaho Code, a one (1) time fee of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), with a subsequent renewal fee of three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per annum. For each license issued to an owner or operator of a beverage, lodging or dining facility within the premises of a year-round resort as described in section 23-957, Idaho Code, a one (1) time fee of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) with a subsequent renewal fee of three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per annum. For each license issued to a lessee of a beverage, lodging or dining facility within the premises of the year-round resort as described in section 23-957, Idaho Code, a one (1) time fee of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) with a subsequent renewal fee of three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per annum.

Provided that any licensee who operates for only a portion of a year may have his license fee prorated from the date he commences operation to the end of the calendar year, but in no event for less than six (6) months.
In the event a licensee who was previously issued a license on a prorated basis under the provisions hereof desires to have such license renewed for the same period for the next succeeding year, he shall file his intention to so apply for such license with the director, accompanied by the fee required for the issuance of such license on or before December 31 of the year preceding.

The license fees herein provided for are exclusive of and in addition to other license fees chargeable in the state of Idaho.

The basis upon which respective populations of municipalities shall be determined is the last preceding census or any subsequent special census conducted by the United States bureau of the census, unless a direct enumeration of the inhabitants thereof be made by the state of Idaho, in which case such later direct enumeration shall constitute such basis.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 4, p. 870; am. 1949, ch. 277, § 1, p. 567; am. 1953, ch. 125, § 1, p. 196; am. 1957, ch. 151, § 2, p. 250; am. 1959, ch. 118, § 2, p. 254; am. 1963, ch. 423, § 1, p. 1098; am. 1965, ch. 35, § 2, p. 52; am. 1967, ch. 143, § 1, p. 326; am. 1967, ch. 417, § 1, p. 1227; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 20, p. 811; am. 1991, ch. 137, § 2, p. 320; am. 2006, ch. 449, § 1, p. 1333; am. 2008, ch. 178, § 1, p. 529.

§ 23-905. Application for licenses — Penalty for false statements.

Prior to the issuance of a license as herein provided, the applicant shall file with the director an application, in writing, signed by the applicant and containing such information and statements relative to the applicant and the premises where the liquor is to be sold as may be required by the director. The application shall be verified by the affidavit of the person making the same before a person authorized to administer oaths and shall be accompanied with the license fee herein required.

In addition to setting forth the qualifications required by other provisions of this act, the application must show:

A detailed description of the premises for which a license is sought and its location.

A detailed statement of the assets and liabilities of the applicant.

The names and addresses of all persons who will have any financial interest in any business to be carried on in and upon the licensed premises, whether such interest results from open loans, mortgages, conditional sales contracts, silent partnerships, trusts or any other basis than open trade accounts incurred in the ordinary course of business, and the amounts of such interests.

The name and address of the applicant, which shall include all members of a partnership or association and the officers, members of the governing board and ten (10) principal stockholders of a corporation.

A copy of the articles of incorporation and bylaws of any corporation, the articles of association and the bylaws of any association, or the articles of partnership of any partnership.

If during the period of any license issued hereunder any change shall take place in any of the requirements of subparagraph (3), (4), or (5) of this section, the licensee shall forthwith make a written report of such change to the director.

If during the period of any license issued hereunder the licensee seeks to move his business from one premise to another in the same city, he may do so subject to the director’s approval that the new premise is suitable for the carrying on of the business.

If any false statement is made in any part of said application, or any subsequent report, the applicant, or applicants, shall be deemed guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be imprisoned in the state prison for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years and fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 5, p. 870; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 21, p. 811; am. 1980, ch. 313, § 1, p. 802; am. 1991, ch. 137, § 3, p. 320; am. 1994, ch. 14, § 3, p. 20.

§ 23-906. Licenses for dining, buffet and club cars, common carrier boats, and common carrier airlines.

Any person operating any line of railroad using dining club or buffet cars in connection with regularly operated train service, or any common carrier boat or boats, or any common carrier airline, desiring a license to sell liquor under the provisions of this act in any such cars, boats, or common carrier aircraft shall apply to the director for a license, as in this act provided, accompanying the application with the license fee herein prescribed.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 6, p. 870; am. 1963, ch. 423, § 2, p. 1098; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 22, p. 811.

§ 23-907. Investigation of applications.

Upon receipt of an application for a license under this act, accompanied by the necessary license fee, the director, within ninety (90) days thereafter, shall cause to be made a thorough investigation of all matters pertaining thereto. The investigation shall include a fingerprint-based criminal history check of the Idaho central criminal history database and the federal bureau of investigation criminal history database. Each person listed as an applicant on an initial application shall submit a full set of fingerprints and the fee to cover the cost of the criminal history background check for such person with the application. If the director shall determine that the contents of the application are true, that such applicant is qualified to receive a license, that his premises are suitable for the carrying on of the business, and that the requirements of this act and the rules promulgated by the director are met and complied with, he shall issue such license; otherwise the application shall be denied and the license fee, less the costs and expenses of investigation, returned to the applicant.

In making the investigation required by this section the director shall have the power to investigate and examine the books and records of the licensee and any person having a financial interest in any business to be conducted on the licensed premises, including, but not limited to, their bank accounts, returns filed under the Idaho income tax act, as amended, and any other sources of information deemed desirable by the director and not specifically prohibited by law.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 7, p. 870; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 23, p. 811; am. 2001, ch. 284, § 1, p. 1014; am. 2016, ch. 77, § 1, p. 254.